src/skiptir/Pyphen/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_is_2020_alpha.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a2b
.ab1o
.a2d1
.að3a2
.aðk2
.að3l2a
.að1s
.a2f
.af1e
.af3le
.af1lé
.af4lið.
.af1lo
.af1ló
.af1læ
.af1n2
.af1o
.af1r
.af1s2
.af3sm
.af1tal
.af1u
.af1æ
.af1ö
.a2g
.ag1at
.ag1e
.ag2n1
.agr1
.a2k
.ak1j
.ak1l
.ak1re
.a2l
.al1a
.al3b2í
.al1e
.al1ið
.al2is
.al1n
.al1o
.al1s2
.alta2
.altal1
.al1æ
.a2m
.a4men
.amr1
.am2s
.a2n
.an2d
.ang2v1
.an3i
.an1k2a
.an3n2es
.an1o
.an1ó
.an2s1
.a2p
.appar1
.ar1ab
.ar2f
.arf1r
.ar3i4
.ar2k
.ar2ma
.ar2n
.ar2s1
.ar2t
.art3u
.a2s
.ask1v
.as2n
.asp3
.ast1
.as1ú
.a2t
.at1a
.a3te3
.at1o
.a3tó
.a3tro
.at1ró
.au3f
.aum1u
.aus1a
.a2v
.av1i
.a2þ1
.á1f
.á2fi
.á1ga
.á3hö
.á1k2
.á1lag
.á1lan
.á1lap
.á3las
.á1lau
.ál3g
.á1li
.á1ly
.á1lö
.á1m2
.á2m3a
.á1nau
.á1ny
.á1rá
.á1re
.á1rið
.á1ró
.ár1r
.ár2st
.ár2s1v
.á1san
.á2sen
.á2s1ke
.á4skinn
.á2skj
.á2sle
.á2spre
.ásta1f4
.á1stan
.á2stj
.á1strí
.á1stu
.á2s1y
.á1ta
.á2to
.á1tr
.á3un
.á1v4
.á2valt
.á1æ
.b4
.b2a2
.ball1
.band1s2
.bar2b3a
.bat2a
.b2i
.bikk1
.bikk3j
.b2í
.bí1sk
.bí1tal
.b2l
.br2
.bu2
.bur4s
.bú1ka
.ch4
.co2
.d2a2
.dag1l
.dag1r
.dan2s
.dav3
.d2e
.dent1
.d2i2
.dil2
.din2
.dir2
.d2í
.d2r2
.dra2
.d2u2
.d2ú
.d2v
.d2y
.e2a
.e2b
.e2d
.ed3i
.e2f
.eff1
.ef2s
.eið3i
.ei3mu
.ein1a
.ein1d
.ein3st
.ek1i
.el2f
.elf3a
.el2l
.ell1e
.el1m
.el2s
.em3a
.em1b2a
.em2b1e
.e1ó
.ep2l
.er3a
.er2g
.e1rik
.erk2
.erl2
.er3li
.er2m
.es2
.et1a
.ey1f2
.ey1m4a
.él1i
.f4
.f2a4
.fal1i
.f2á
.f2e
.f2i2
.fir2m
.fis2h1e
.f2í
.fj4
.f2l2
.fla2
.for1k2
.f2ó
.f2r2
.fra4
.fræð4is
.fræ1nó
.f2u2
.fur2s
.f2y
.g4
.g2a2
.gafl1
.gal1a
.gal1e
.ga4s
.g2i2
.g2í
.gja2
.g2l2
.gla2
.glas1k
.glat3
.glu2
.g2n2
.gná3
.g2o
.gór1
.gós2
.g2r2
.gra4
.gri2
.g2u2
.gul1an
.gul1ö
.gust3
.g2v4
.g2æ
.h2e
.hel4stan
.h2í
.h2o
.h2ó
.hu2
.h2ú
.id2
.ið2k
.ið2ug
.il2l
.ill1æ
.ilm1
.il1p
.i2m
.ims1
.in2g
.ing1er
.ingj1
.in4n1
.inn2i
.inni1s
.ir2r1
.is1lan
.i2v1
.iv3a
.í1f2
.í3fe
.í1ga
.í1gi
.í1gj
.í1k
.ík2a
.í1l
.í3le
.í1mið
.í1mil
.ín2
.í3ne
.íng3
.í1ny
.ír1ó
.ír2s
.í3sen
.í3set
.í2sí
.ís1kei
.ís1kul
.í2skö
.ís1l
.í2sn
.ís1nú
.í2s1on
.í1stan
.í2ste
.í2str
.í2stæ
.í2sö
.í1tak
.ít1ali
.í1te
.í1tö
.í2va
.í3vas
.j2a2
.jar2m
.jas3i
.jár2
.j2e
.j2i
.jó2k
.jó1mu
.jó2n
.jó4se
.j2u2
.jú2
.k4
.k2a2
.kab3
.kal1e
.kal1ið
.kal1ín
.ka4m
.kara2
.kar2b1í
.kari1
.kar2la
.karl1e
.kar2s
.kas1e
.kat1e
.kav3
.ká2l
.kál3m2
.k2f
.k2i2
.kis1k
.kí2
.kj4
.kjal1a
.kjark3
.k2l2
.kla2
.klak1l
.klav1
.k2n2
.kna2
.k2o
.k2ó2
.kóf1
.kót3
.k2r2
.kra2
.k2u2
.kunn1
.kus2
.k2v2
.kvið1r
.l2a2
.lafr1
.lag1e
.lam1að
.lar2f
.las1ú
.lav1
.lá2g
.l2e
.l2i2
.lib1
.líb1
.lín1
.l2o
.ló2fa
.ló1gr
.ló2lí
.l2u2
.lut2
.l2ú
.l2y
.læ1v
.m4
.m2a2
.mag3i
.maj1
.mal1an
.mal1e
.mand1
.man1s
.mar1it
.mar2kv
.mask3
.mat1af
.má2
.mál1an
.más1
.m2e2
.m2i
.min2g
.m2í
.mín3
.mo2
.m2ó
.m2u2
.mur2k
.mus1u
.m2ú
.m2ö
.n2a2
.n2á
.ná1s
.n2e
.nef1l
.nert3
.nes1k2
.n2i2
.n2í
.n2o
.n3ox
.n2ó
.n2u2
.n2y
.ný1f
.næ2
.o2f
.of1e
.ofs2
.of1sin
.of1sv
.of1tr
.oft1s
.of3u2
.o2l
.ole3
.op1a
.or2d3
.ore1
.or2g1
.or2k
.or2m
.ot2h3
.ó1
.ó3a2f
.ó3a2l1a
.ó3ar
.ó3b2a
.ód2
.óf4
.ófa2
.óg2
.ó3ge
.ók2
.ó3ku
.óla2f
.ó3la2st1
.ó3lav
.ó3ler
.ól2g
.ól2i
.ó2l1ína
.óls2
.ól1us
.ó2m2að
.óm4ari
.óm2i
.óm3s
.óm2un
.ó3ne
.ón1g
.ón2í
.ónu2
.ó2p1a
.ó3par
.ór2
.ó3sað
.ó2sala
.ó3sj
.ós2k
.ó4skaði
.ó2sla
.ós2le
.ó3s2m
.ósn2
.óst2
.ós2var
.ó3sy
.ót2
.óta2
.ó3tr
.óvi2
.p2a2
.pam1
.par2k1
.par2m
.past1
.pá2
.p2e
.pek1
.pé2
.p2f
.p2h
.p2i2
.pil2
.pin2
.p2í
.pí2s
.pj2
.p2l2
.pla2
.plast1
.po2
.pr2
.p2u2
.r2a2
.ra4d
.rad1í
.raf3l
.rask3
.rá2r1
.r2e
.re1g2is
.r2i2
.r2í
.rí2k
.rí1st
.r2o
.ró1n
.r2u2
.rú4m
.rúsk2
.r2v
.r2y
.s4
.s2a4
.s2á
.sál1f
.s2e
.s2f
.s2h
.s2i
.si2g
.si2k
.sim1o
.sis2
.s2í
.sí1gi
.s2j2
.sjar2
.s2k4
.ska2
.sker3l2
.ski2
.skj2
.skr2
.sku2
.skul1i
.s2l2
.sla2
.slav3
.s2m
.smá1la
.smæ1l2
.s2n2
.sna2
.s2o
.s2p4
.spr2
.s2t4
.sta2
.stal1í
.star2f
.str2
.s2u2
.sus1
.s2v
.s2y
.sæl2a
.t4
.t2a2
.tab3
.taf2l
.tak1v
.tal1a
.tal1i
.tan2
.tar2f3
.tav1
.t2á
.tá1li
.t2e
.te1ru
.tes2
.t2h
.thol3
.t2i2
.til1
.till2
.tils2
.t2í
.t2o2
.tóp1
.t2r2
.tra2
.t2s2
.t2u2
.tug2a
.t2ú
.t2v
.tví3m
.tyr2
.t2ý
.uf2
.uff3
.u2m1
.um3k
.um3s
.und2ra
.un2g
.unn3
.ur2b
.ur2g1
.ur2t
.ut3a
.utan1g
.ú2f
.úf1j
.ú1k
.úl3u
.úr1
.úrk2
.ú2t
.út3l
.ú3tó
.úts2
.v2a2
.vara1f
.var3f
.var2p
.var3tá
.veld2a1
.vi2
.ví2g
.ví2k
.vín1
.v2u
.y2a
.yð2v
.yf3i
.yrl2
.z2a
.þ2a
.þ2ó
.æð3isk
.æð2ist
.æg2isv
.æk1
.æt2is
.æt2l3
.æ1vara
.æ1ve
.öfl1
.öfl3u
.öf3u2
.ögr1
.ökr3
.öl3s2
.öl1t2
.öl3ví
.önn3us
.ör1a
.ör1kv
.ör3s2
.ör1t
.ör1u
a1a
aa2b
aabb1
aab1e
a2ac
aa2f
aaf1r
a2a2g1
aal2m
aa1lu
a2ard
aa2s
aat1
a1á
aá2b
aá2f
aá2g
aá2h
aák2
aá2n
aá2r
aá2s
aá2t
aá2v4
a1b
2ab.
ab1ad
a2b1ana
ab3arb
ab1att
a2bb
2abe
3abesk
1abi.
3abía
1ab1ís
ab1íta
ab1íti
2abl
a2bm
2abo
ab1ór
2abr
abram2
abramb1
1a2bs
ab2sk
abu2
ab1úl
2abæ
2abö
2ach
acr1
a1d
a3dai
ad2an
a2d2d
2ade
a2dí
a3díl
a3dís
2adís.
ad1ísu
a2dm1
ad1on.
ad1or
ad1ól
adra2
adr1il
adr1ón
adr2u
a2ds
ad2u
adul1
ad1ús
ad2v
2adö
2aðag
2aðak
aðg2
að3ir
2aðirn
1aðis
að1j
aðja2
að2ki
2aðm
að2ma
aðm3ars
að2m1u
aðr1aka
aðr1aki
aðr1ek
aðr1ik
aðr1ok
að1sá
að2skj
aðs1tal
aðs1v
að2sve
að2sö
1aðu.
að1v4
a1e
aeð4
aeðl1
a1é
2afa
af1ald
af1ali
af1alu
af1an
af2ang
af3angu
a1f2ant
af3ar
afar1f
a1fat
af1au
af1ál
af1ás
2afe
af1ei
aferl1i
af1ert
af1ets
af3eyr
af1ét
a2ff
af1fa
af1fu
afg2
af3gr
a1fiðr
af3ik
a1fil
af1ild
af1irn
a1firr
a1fis
af1ist
a1fit
2afí
af1ín.
af1ína
af1íó
af1ír
af1ít
2a1fj2
af3ju
1afkö
af1lag
3aflam
af1lang
1aflasp
1aflat
af1lau
1aflav
1aflaþ
af1lá
2afleg
2afley
a2fli
af1lim
af1lí
2aflo
af1lop
a1fló
a1flu
af1lur
af1lúð
af1lúk
af1lý
a1flæ
af1lög
af3mu
a2fn
2afn.
2afna
afn1au
afn1d
2afn3i
1afnot
afnu2
afn1æ
2afo
af1of
af2ol
a3fos
a1fr
af1ran
af1rás
af1rei
af1ren
af1ré
af1ris
af2rí
afr1ík
afr1ís
af1rún
af1ræn
a2fs
af1sa
af2s1eð
af3sí
af3skj
af1sl
af2slö
af1sn
af3sp
af3stö
af1su
af1sú
a2ft
afta1f
af1tau
af1to
2afug
2aful
a1fun
1afurð
afur1n
afur1t
a1fut
af1úld
2afý
af1öld
af1önd
aför1
2agal
a1gal.
a1gald
ag1alf
ag1als
a2gand
1agaó
aga1p
2agar
ag2a1re
ag2a1ro
a1g2arp
ag1ats
a1gá
ag2át
2age
ag1ef
a3gel
ag1era
ag1erh
a2g1eri
ag1erm
ag1ers
agerv3
2agg
agg1at.
agg3i
ag1gj
ag1go
a2gh
agi2
a1gib
a1gif
a1gig
a1gil
ag2ir
ag3it
2a1gj
a1glam
agl1an
ag1lán
ag1lið
ag1lis
a1glit
ag1lík
a1gló
2a1glu
ag1lyk
ag1löð
agm4
agn1d2
a1gneg
agn1ú
ag1ný
ag1on
ag1or
a1gó
a1gr
ag1reg
agri1s
agr1y
ag1ræ
ag2seð
ag2ske
ag2skj
ags1lu
ag2spr
ag2s3vi
ag2sö
ag3ua
a1guð
a1guf
a1g2ul
a1gus
a1gut
ag1úl
agv4
ag1yr
4a1h
ah2ó
ahóf2s
a1i
aið2k
a2ih
a1í
aí2b
1aík2
aí2l1í
a2ím
aís1
aí2þ
a1j
aj1as
a2j1e
a2j1o
ajó2
aj1ón1
aj2u
a1kaðl
aka1g
a2kale
a2kalí
ak1alo
ak1aó
aka1pl
a1karl
ak3arn
a1k2art
ak1astu
a2ka1t
2a1ká2
2a1ke
ak1el.
ak1ett
ak3ið
ak1il
a1k2ing
a1kip
a1kis
a1kí
ak1ís
2a1kj
a2k2k
ak3ko
akk1sá
akk1t
akk1u
akk3us
ak2lap
a1klas
ak1lás
ak1li
ak2lif
a1klo
a1klu
2akm
ak3má
a1knap
a1k2ná
a1knú
ak1ný
2a1ko
ak1op.
ak1orð
2a1kó
akó3m
akr1ana
ak1rau
ak1ráð
ak1rek
akr3íl
a1kró
ak3róm
ak1r2u
a1krö
a2ks
ak2sei
aks1ko
ak2skr
ak2s1m
aks1n
aks1ú
ak1s2van
a2kt
ak1tal
ak1tam
ak1tau
ak1tei
ak1tr
a1k2uð
a1kuf
a1kuk
a1kul
a1k2un
ak3ur
a1k2us
a1kú
ak1ún
a1kv2
ak1vat
ak1vör
a1ky
a1ký
a1kæ
2a1kö
al1að
a2laf
al1afl
a1lag
3a4laí
al1akí
al1akt
al3amí
a1lamp
a1land
a3lang
al3ans
al3ará
al3are
al4arei
ala2rey
a3lass
a2lat
al1at.
ala1ta
al1atg
al1atv
2a1lau
al1auð
a1lá2
al1áf
al1ágó
al1áh
2aláki
al1ákv
al1ál
2alán
al1ár
al1ást
al1áv
a2ld
al1d2ans
aldin1g2
ald1jö
al2dreg
ald1rek
ald1ris
al2drö
ald2sei
alds1ke
aldur1
aldur3n2
2ale
al1ed
al1ef
al1eigi
al1ein
al1el
3a2l1em
al1en.
al1ent
a3lep
al1er
3alera
al3erk
3al1ett
al1ex
al1eyg
a1lé
2alét
al1f4
al3fr
al1g
al3ge
1al2gí
al1ia
a1liði
a1liðs
a1liðu
ali1k2
a1lim
a2lin.
2a1l2ind
al3ine
a1lip
ali3sei
1alis2m1
a1l2it
a1lí
alí2a
al1íba
al1íni
1al1ís
a1lj
al1ja
al1já
2aljó
al1kal
al1ká
al1kj
al1k2u
al3kvi
a2ll
all1d
all1i
all1o
all2sko
all2sky
all2tei
all1tu
all3u
al1lú
al1ly
all1ær
al1m
alm4ar
alm2i
al2mo
a2ln
al3ne
a1lo
al1ofn
2alog
al1om
al1op
a1lóð
al1óf
al1ó2h
al1óna
a1lóni
al1ór
1al1ót
alp2ar
al1pi
al1pr
al1pu
al1sak
als1ett
al2s1ín
als1kal
al1ske
1alskæ
al1s2len
als3ló
al1smj
als1óm
als2pa
alst2
al2stu
al1sug
a2lt
al3tí
alt1sv
al1t2un
al1u
a1lub
a1l2un
al1úð
al2úðu
al1úm
a1lús
al1útt
2a1ly
al1yfi
2a1lý
1alz
2a1læ
al1æð.
al1æs
al1ætt
2a1lö
a2l1öf
al1ör
a1m4ag
am1akk
am1aks
am1al
a3malu
am3al1æ
am3an.
am1anf
am1ang
am1ani
a1mann
aman1s
am1anv
a2mar.
am3ara
am3ar2f
am3arh
am3ari
am3arm
am3ars
ama2t
am1atí
a3matu
am1aum
a1má2
a2m1ák
a3mál
a3mán
am1áv
a2mb
amb1ass
a2md
am1dv
2amei
a3men
am1en.
am1eri
3amerí
am1ers
a3met
am3eyk
a1mé
a2mf
a1mi2
am1ið.
a3miðj
am1iðn
am3ikv
2a3mil
am1ill
am1ist
a1míd
am1íð.
am1ík
am1ís
a1m2ít
a1mj
a2m1ja
am1já
a3mjó
a3mjö
amk2
a2ml
am3lu
a2mm
amma1l
amm1d2
amm1ís
a2mn
am1or
4amó
amó1k
am1ól
a2mp
am1pí
am1p2un
a2ms
am1sa
1amsd
am3sk
am1sn
1amss
am1su
am1sv
a2m1t
1am2ti
1amtm
a3m2uð4
amuðl3
a3mul
a1mun
amun2l3
a3mura
amur2l3
a3murt
a3mus
a1múl
am1úr
a1mús
a2m1yg
am1yrt
am1æs
2amö
a3mör
1an.
an1adí
an2aðr
2anafn
an1afs
an1aft
2a1nag.
an1ak.
an1aki
an1ali
an1all
an3ar1a
an2a1re
anar2k
an1as.
an1at.
an1ate
2a1nau
3anauk
1aná.
aná1l
2anám
a2n1ár
a2n1át
1anc
2and.
an2da
an2de
and1j
and1nu
and1rey
an2drj
and1rjú
and1ru
ands4eyr
and3stí
2andu
an2dý
an2dæ
2ane
3an1eg
an1ei
a2n1en
an1er
4a3nes
3a2n1ett
an1é
1anfe
1anfy
2anga.
3angei
an1gif
an1gj
an2gl
ang1lu
ang1lö
angn2a
ang1raf
an1gró
ang1st
3angú
angv4a
an3ia
2a1nib
2aniðu
an3i2k
anik1e
an3il
anis2m1
1aní
an1íd
an1íe
an2íet
an1ík
an1íl
an1ís
an1ít
an1ja
2anjó
1anke
an2k1er
an2kl
1ankó
an1kun
1anl
a2nn
an2na
2annaf
2annag
ann1d
1annef
2ann1k
2ann3l2
2anns
ann1sk
ann2sl
ann2sæð
ann2sæv
ann1t
2annu
an1næð
2a1no
an1ok
an1on
an1orð
an1os
an1óki
an1ón
2a1nór
anó1s
2a1nót
an3sey
an1so
ans1ós
anst2
an1s2u
an2sæð
an1tak
ant3ill
1ant1í
an1tór
1ants
ant2sk
an1t2v
1antý
1anu
2a1nud
an3ue
3anum
an1úa
an1úk
2anúm
a1núp
3an1úr
an1út
1anve
1anvo
2a1nyk
an1yr
2a1ný
an1ýf
2anz1
2a1næ
3an1æv
2a1nö
an1ök
a1o
aor2m
a1ó
aó2b
aó2e
aó2f
a2ói
aó2j
aó1l
aó2m
aó2s
1aósv
aó2t1
ap2ak
ap1al
ap1and
apa2ra
apar1r
ap3aræ
ap1atí
ap1ax
ap1á2
a1pe
a2p1ei
ap1ell
ap1eyj
a1pé
ap2h1e
api2
a1pil
ap1ill
ap1is
ap1it
a1pík
1ap1ín
ap1ít
ap3ku
2apl2
a1pló
ap1lu
a1po
ap1on
ap1orð
ap1ód
a2pp
a1pr
ap1rau
ap1rek
ap1ræ
ap1su
ap1sú
2apu2
a1puk
a1pum
a1pun
a1pú
ap1yn
ap1yr
ap1ý
a1pö
ap1ön
1ar
2arada
2aradí
ar1að
ar2aðan
2a1raðh
2araðir
ara1fa
ar1afb
ar1aff
ar1afg
ar3afí
ar1afk
ar1afl
a1rafm
ar1afn
araf2o
2araft
2a1rafv
ar1agð
ara1gl
arag2r
2a1ragu
ar1agú
ar1agv
3araj
2a1rak.
ara1ka
3arake
2a1rakn
ar1aks
ar1akt
ara1li
ar1alin
ar1all
ar1alu
ara1m
ara3mi
ar1an
2arani
4aranns
arap2
ara1pa
ara1pi
ar2a1rás
ara1rei
4arart
aras2
2a1rass
ar1at.
ara3t2a
ar1atl
ar1au
2a1rauf
2a1raun
2a1raup
2a1r2aus
ar1ax
ará2
3a2rá.
3ar1áb
ar1ád
4a1ráð
ar1áf
ar1ág
ar1áh
3a2r1ák
ar3ál
ar1ám
a1rán
3a2r1ár
ar1ás
2a1rása
2a1rásin
ar1át
3ar1áv
2arð
arð3las
arð1r
arð2sen
arð3u
2a1red
ar1eð
ar1ef
3arefn
2a1refs
4a1refu
2a1reg
3ar1egg
2areik
ar3eik.
2a1reim
3a2r1ein
a1reip
ar1eis
2a1rek
ar1ekl
ar1ekr
ar1el
ar1em
ar1en
a2reng
4a1renn
ar1ep
ar1er
ar1es
ar1et
ar1ex
ar1ey
2areyn
ar2eyrð
2a1ré
3a2r1él
ar3éti
2arf.
3arfé
2arfh
ar1fil
ar1fis
ar1fit
3arfja
3arfó
2arfs
arf1t
3arful
3arfö
arg1ali
arg1ast
4argb
ar3gel
4argf
ar1g2is
ar1git
ar2gref
arg1s2v
ar1guð
ar1g2ul
ar2g1yr
ar2göl
3arhr
2a1rid
ar1ið
2arið.
2a1riða
2ariði
2arif
a1rif.
4a1rig
ar1i2k1e
ari1kj
ar1ikt
ar1il
4arim
ar3i2n
arin1gr
ari1p
4arir
ari1sk2i
4arit
ari1tr
2a1riþ
3arí.
ar1íá
3aríb
ar1íe
3a2rí1f
2a1rí2g
ar1ígi
3arí2h
2a1r2ík
ar1íla
ar1ímó
ar1ín3
ar1ío
ar1ís.
ar1ísd
ar1ísi
ar1ít
ar1j4
2a1rjáf
a1rjó
2a1rjú
ar1kaf
ar2k1el
3arkep
ark1irn
ar1kj
ark2spa
ark2sv
ark1t
ar1kul
ar1kun
ar2köl
3arlag.
ar3lá
3arlit
3arlj
ar3l1u
3arlú
3arlæk
3arlær
3arlö
arm3ana
arm3ari
arm1d
4armg
ar3mun
ar4mur
arm1ör.
2arn.
arn1d
2arnin
ar1nót
arn2sky
arn2sl
arn2s1p
arnu2
ar1num
ar1o
3aro.
3arod
2a1roð
a1rof.
ar2oka
2a1rot
aró2
ar1ód
ar1óð
2a1róf
ar1ófr
2a1róg
ar1ók
ar1ól
2aróman
ar1ón
3ar1óp
ar1ór
ar1ósi
2arót.
ar1óv
ar1pil
3arpí
ar1rad
2arrað
ar1ran
ar1rid
arr1k
3arro
ar1r2u
ars2ár
arsk4a
ar3sli
ar2s1mo
arsn2
ars2p
arst4
3arsy
ar3t2án
art3ili
artr2
2arts
art3uf
ar1tun
ar1tus
3artú
3arty
ar3tæ
ar1u2
2a1r2uð
ar3uf
2arug
2a1r2una
2a1r2unu
ar3ut
ar1ú
2arúð
